Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-116
Residence, defined.

Residence shall mean (1) that place in Nebraska in which a person is actually domiciled, which is the residence of an individual or family, with which a person has a settled connection for the determination of his or her civil status or other legal purposes because it is actually or legally his or her permanent and principal home, and to which, whenever he or she is absent, he or she has the intention of returning, (2) the place in Nebraska where a person has his or her family domiciled even if he or she does business in another place, and (3) if a person is homeless, the county in Nebraska in which the person is living. No person serving in the armed forces of the United States shall be deemed to have a residence in Nebraska because of being stationed in Nebraska.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 16;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 29.

This section does not establish absolute criteria for determining residence or domicile. Dilsaver v. Pollard, 191 Neb. 241, 214 N.W.2d 478 (1994).

This section does not enlarge or limit the provisions of the Constitution which prescribe the qualifications of electors. Berry v. Wilcox, 44 Neb. 82, 62 N.W. 249, 48 A.S.R. 706 (1895).